Mississippi, session 2026, HB926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless context of use clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Automated speed enforcement device" means a photographic, radar, lidar, laser or other device with one (1) or more vehicle sensors that transmits a vehicle's speed and an image of the rear license plate of a vehicle exceeding the speed limit. (b) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Transportation. (c)  "Highway work zone" means a lane or portion of a public highway, road or street open to vehicular traffic and the affected area adjacent to that lane, berm or shoulder of a public highway, road or street upon which construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, maintenance, inspection or other work of that nature is being conducted within this state and is marked: (i)  By appropriate warning signs or other traffic control devices indicating that work is in progress; and (ii)  By signs of a design approved by the Department of Transportation indicating that any person who operates a motor vehicle within a highway work zone at a speed in excess of the reduced maximum speed limit may be punished by a fine of double the maximum amount otherwise authorized by law. (d)  "Images" means images transmitted by an automated speed enforcement device showing the speed and rear license plate of a motor vehicle. (2)  A law enforcement officer may issue a citation at the time of an offense in a highway work zone based on images transmitted by an automated speed enforcement device if: (a)  A motor vehicle is detected traveling in excess of ten (10) miles per hour over the posted speed limit; (b)  At least one (1) bona fide worker is present in the highway work zone; and (c)  There is a law enforcement officer certified under the law enforcement officers training program prescribed in Section 45-6-1 et seq., present in or near the end of the highway work zone in a marked vehicle. (3)  The department shall: (a)  Install signage in highway work zones notifying the public that vehicle speed within the work zone may be enforced by an automated speed enforcement device; (b)  Require the signage to be affixed with lights that shall be flashing at all times when the automated speed enforcement device is active; and (c)  Calibrate the automated speed enforcement device on an annual basis. (4)  An image transmitted by an automated speed enforcement device under this section shall not be disclosed to anyone other than the driver of the vehicle. (5)  The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations relating to any matters necessary for the efficient administration of automated speed enforcement under this section. SECTION 2.  Section 63-3-516, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-3-516.  (1)  It is unlawful for any person to operate a motor vehicle within a highway work zone at a speed in excess of the maximum speed limit specifically established for the zone whenever workers are present and whenever the zone is indicated by appropriately placed signs displaying the reduced maximum speed limit.  Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished, upon conviction, for a first offense by a fine of not more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00); and for second, third and subsequent offenses by a fine of double the maximum fine imposed for second, third or subsequent offenses under Section 63-9-11. (2)  For the purposes of this section the term "highway work zone" means * * *a construction or maintenance area that is located on or along any public highway, road or street within this state that a lane or portion of a public highway, road or street open to vehicular traffic and the affected area adjacent to that lane, berm or shoulder of a public highway, road or street upon which construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, maintenance, inspection or other work of that nature is being conducted within this state and is marked: (a)  By appropriate warning signs or other traffic control devices indicating that work is in progress; and (b)  By signs of a design approved by the Department of Transportation indicating that any person who operates a motor vehicle within a highway work zone at a speed in excess of the reduced maximum speed limit may be punished by a fine of double the maximum amount otherwise authorized by law. (3)  Nothing in this section shall preclude the prosecution or conviction for careless or reckless driving of any motor vehicle operator whose operation of a motor vehicle in a highway work zone, apart from speed, demonstrates the operation of the same in a careless or imprudent manner in violation of Section 63-3-1213 or in a reckless manner in violation of Section 63-3-1201. (4)  Every person who operates any motor vehicle in violation of the provisions of this section and who causes property damage to road construction equipment or a motor vehicle in an amount of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or greater within a highway work zone shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a separate misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term of not less than thirty (30) days nor more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court, and the court shall, as a condition of any sentence imposed determine the extent of the property damage caused by the violator and require the violator to make restitution to the injured party upon such terms and conditions determined by the court.  Nothing herein however shall prevent the injured party from pursuing any other civil remedies against the violators as allowed by law. (5)  Every person who operates any motor vehicle in violation of the provisions of this section and who causes the death of another within a highway work zone or mutilates, disfigures, permanently disables or destroys the tongue, eye, lip, nose or any other limb, organ or member of another within a highway work zone shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a separate felony for each victim who suffers death, mutilation, disfigurement or other injury and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) and shall be committed to the custody of the State Department of Corrections for a period of time of not less than three (3) years and not to exceed fifteen (15) years for each death, mutilation, disfigurement or other injury, and the imprisonment for the second or each subsequent conviction, in the discretion of the court, shall commence either at the termination of the imprisonment for the preceding conviction or run concurrently with the preceding conviction. (6)  In order for an increased fine to be imposed under this section, the highway work zone must have: (a)  Signs displayed informing drivers of the existence of a highway work zone and that fines are increased in it; and (b)  At least one (1) bona fide worker is present in the highway work zone. (c)  If a violation of any of the offenses identified in subsection (1) of this section can be classified as a misdemeanor, those penalties shall apply in addition to the penalties in subsection (1) of this section. (3)  All fines collected for violations in a highway work zone under this section shall be deposited into a special fund in the State Treasury known as the "Highway Work Zone Safety Fund".     SECTION 3.  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Highway Work Zone Safety Fund," which shall consist of funds collected for violations of Section 63-3-516, funds made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the safety fund shall be used exclusively by the Department of Transportation to hire or pay for enhanced law enforcement of traffic laws within highway work zones. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.